Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.605

Personal wireless services—Random testing on power density analysis—Rules.

Unless this section is preempted by applicable federal statutes, the department may require that in residential zones or areas, all providers of personal wireless services, as defined in *section 1 of this act, provide random test results on power density analysis for the provider's licensed frequencies showing radio frequency levels before and after development of the personal wireless service antenna facilities, following national standards or protocols of the federal communications commission or other federal agencies. This section shall not apply to microcells as defined in RCW 80.36.375. The department may adopt rules to implement this section.

[ 1996 c 323 s 7.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to section 1 of this act is erroneous. Section 2 of the act, codified as RCW 43.21C.0384, was apparently intended.

Findings—1996 c 323: See note following RCW 43.70.600.